New York, session 2025-2026, S1891.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1111-j to read as follows: 3 § 1111-j. Owner liability for failure of an operator to comply with 4 street cleaning parking rules. (a) 1. Notwithstanding any other 5 provision of law, the city of New York is hereby authorized to establish 6 a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 7 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with posted street 8 cleaning parking rules in such city in accordance with the provisions of 9 this section. Such demonstration program shall empower the New York 10 city department of sanitation to install street cleaning vehicle photo 11 devices on street cleaning vehicles along street cleaning routes at 12 locations determined by such department in such city and to administer 13 such program in consultation with the New York city department of trans- 14 portation. 15 2. Any photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 16 images captured by street cleaning vehicle photo devices shall be inad- 17 missible in any disciplinary proceeding convened by the department and 18 any proceeding initiated by the department involving licensure privi- 19 leges of street cleaning vehicle operators. Any street cleaning vehicle EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05516-05-6 S. 1891--A 2 1 photo device mounted on a street cleaning vehicle shall be directed 2 outwardly from such vehicle to capture images of vehicles operated in 3 violation of street cleaning parking rules, and images produced by such 4 device shall not be used for any other purpose in the absence of a court 5 order requiring such images to be produced. 6 3. No street cleaning vehicle photo device shall be used unless on the 7 day it is to be used it has successfully passed a self-test of its func- 8 tions. 9 4. (i) The city of New York shall adopt and enforce measures to 10 protect the privacy of drivers, passengers, pedestrians and cyclists 11 whose identity and identifying information may be captured by a street 12 cleaning photo device. Such measures shall include: 13 (A) utilization of necessary technologies to ensure, to the extent 14 practicable, that photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other 15 recorded images produced by such street cleaning vehicle photo device 16 shall not include images that identify the driver, the passengers, or 17 the contents of the vehicle. Provided, however, that no notice 18 of liability issued pursuant to this section shall be dismissed solely 19 because such a photograph, microphotograph, videotape or other 20 recorded image allows for the identification of the driver, the passen- 21 gers, or the contents of vehicles where the city shows that it made 22 reasonable efforts to comply with the provisions of this paragraph in 23 such case; and 24 (B) oversight procedures to ensure compliance with the privacy 25 protection measures under this subdivision. 26 (ii) Photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other recorded 27 image from a street cleaning vehicle photo device shall be for the 28 exclusive use of the city for the purpose of the adjudication of liabil- 29 ity imposed pursuant to this section and of the owner receiving a notice 30 of liability pursuant to this section, and shall be destroyed by the 31 city upon the final resolution of the notice of liability to which such 32 photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images 33 relate, or one year following the date of issuance of such notice of 34 liability, whichever is later. Notwithstanding the provisions of any 35 other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, photographs, microphoto- 36 graphs, videotape or any other recorded image from a street 37 cleaning vehicle photo device shall not be open to the public, nor 38 subject to civil or criminal process or discovery, nor used by any 39 court or administrative or adjudicatory body in any action or proceed- 40 ing therein except that which is necessary for the adjudication of a 41 notice of liability issued pursuant to this section, and no 42 public entity or employee, officer or agent thereof shall disclose 43 such information, except that such photographs, microphotographs, 44 videotape or any other recorded images from such devices: 45 (A) shall be available for inspection and copying and use by the motor 46 vehicle owner and operator for so long as such photographs, microphoto- 47 graphs, videotape or other recorded images are required to be maintained 48 or are maintained by such public entity, employee, officer or agent; and 49 (B) (1) shall be furnished when described in a search warrant issued 50 by a court authorized to issue such a search warrant pursuant to article 51 six hundred ninety of the criminal procedure law or a federal court 52 authorized to issue such a search warrant under federal law, where such 53 search warrant states that there is reasonable cause to believe such 54 information constitutes evidence of, or tends to demonstrate that, a 55 misdemeanor or felony offense was committed in this state or another 56 state, or that a particular person participated in the commission of a S. 1891--A 3 1 misdemeanor or felony offense in this state or another state, provided, 2 however, that if such offense was against the laws of another state, the 3 court shall only issue a warrant if the conduct comprising such offense 4 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony 5 against the laws of this state; and 6 (2) shall be furnished in response to a subpoena duces tecum signed by 7 a judge of competent jurisdiction and issued pursuant to article six 8 hundred ten of the criminal procedure law or a judge or magistrate of a 9 federal court authorized to issue such a subpoena duces tecum under 10 federal law, where the judge finds and the subpoena states that there is 11 reasonable cause to believe such information is relevant and material to 12 the prosecution, or the defense, or the investigation by an authorized 13 law enforcement official, of the alleged commission of a misdemeanor or 14 felony in this state or another state, provided, however, that if such 15 offense was against the laws of another state, such judge or magistrate 16 shall only issue such subpoena if the conduct comprising such offense 17 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony in 18 this state; and 19 (3) may, if lawfully obtained pursuant to this clause and clause (A) 20 of this subparagraph and otherwise admissible, be used in such criminal 21 action or proceeding. 22 (iii) The demonstration program authorized pursuant to this section is 23 prohibited from utilizing and from arranging for the utilization of 24 biometric identifying technology, including but not limited to facial 25 recognition technology, for any purpose. The use, and the arrangement 26 for the use, of biometric identifying technology, including but not 27 limited to facial recognition technology, on photographs, microphoto- 28 graphs, videotape, or any other recorded image or data produced by a 29 street cleaning photo device, by any person for any purpose, are prohib- 30 ited. For purposes of this subparagraph, "person" shall include, but not 31 be limited to, a human being, a public or private corporation, an unin- 32 corporated association, a partnership, a government or a governmental 33 instrumentality, a court or an administrative or adjudicatory body, and 34 any employee, officer, and agent of the foregoing. 35 5. Every street cleaning vehicle upon which a street cleaning vehicle 36 photo device is installed and operated pursuant to a demonstration 37 program authorized pursuant to this section shall be equipped with 38 signs, placards or other displays giving notice to motor vehicle opera- 39 tors that street cleaning vehicle photo devices are used to enforce 40 street cleaning parking rules. 41 6. Warning notices of violation shall be issued during the first sixty 42 days that street cleaning vehicle photo devices pursuant to a demon- 43 stration program authorized by this section are active and in operation. 44 7. The city of New York shall adopt and enforce measures: 45 (i) to upgrade signage at regular intervals within street cleaning 46 routes stating that street cleaning vehicle photo devices are used to 47 enforce street cleaning parking rules along such routes; and 48 (ii) to prohibit the use or dissemination of vehicles' license plate 49 information and other information and images captured by street cleaning 50 vehicle photo devices except: (A) as required to establish liability 51 under this section or collect payment of penalties; (B) as required by 52 court order; or (C) as otherwise required by law. 53 (b) If the city of New York has established a program pursuant to 54 subdivision (a) of this section, the owner of a vehicle shall be liable 55 for a penalty imposed pursuant to this section if such vehicle was 56 parked in violation of any street cleaning parking rule of such city and S. 1891--A 4 1 such violation is evidenced by information obtained from a street clean- 2 ing vehicle photo device. 3 (c) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 4 following meanings: 5 1. "Biometric identifying technology" shall mean any tool using an 6 automated or semi-automated process that assists in verifying a person's 7 identity based on a person's biometric information. 8 2. "Biometric information" shall mean any measurable physical, physio- 9 logical or behavioral characteristics that are attributable to a person, 10 including but not limited to facial characteristics, fingerprint charac- 11 teristics, hand characteristics, eye characteristics, vocal character- 12 istics, and any other characteristics that can be used to identify a 13 person including, but not limited to: fingerprints; handprints; retina 14 and iris patterns; DNA sequence; voice; gait; and facial geometry. 15 3. "Facial recognition" shall mean any tool using an automated or 16 semiautomated process that assists in uniquely identifying or verifying 17 a person by comparing and analyzing patterns based on the person's face. 18 4. "Owner" shall have the meaning provided in article two-B of this 19 chapter. 20 5. "Street cleaning routes" shall mean street cleaning routes desig- 21 nated by the New York city department of sanitation that include 22 upgraded signage stating that street cleaning vehicle photo devices are 23 used to enforce street cleaning parking rules. 24 6. "Street cleaning parking rules" shall mean the prohibited parking 25 of any vehicle on one side of the street to allow for cleaning by the 26 New York city department of sanitation during designated time periods as 27 posted by sign pursuant to the rules of the New York city department of 28 transportation. 29 7. "Street cleaning vehicle" shall mean any vehicle operated by the 30 New York city department of sanitation that is designed to wash dirt and 31 grime, and remove litter and debris, from the street surface. 32 8. "Street cleaning vehicle photo device" shall mean a device that is 33 mounted on a street cleaning vehicle, is capable of operating independ- 34 ently of an enforcement officer and produces one or more images of each 35 vehicle at the time it is in violation of street cleaning parking rules. 36 (d) A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed by 37 the city of New York in which the charged violation occurred, or a 38 facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphoto- 39 graphs, videotape or other recorded images produced by a street cleaning 40 vehicle photo device, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts 41 contained therein. Any photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other 42 recorded images evidencing such a violation shall be available for 43 inspection in any proceeding to adjudicate the liability for such 44 violation pursuant to this section. 45 (e) An owner liable for a violation of a street cleaning parking rule 46 imposed on any route shall be liable for monetary penalties in accord- 47 ance with a schedule of fines and penalties promulgated by the parking 48 violations bureau of the city of New York; provided, however, that the 49 monetary penalty for violating a street cleaning parking rule shall not 50 exceed fifty dollars for each violation; provided, further, that an 51 owner shall be liable for an additional penalty not to exceed twenty- 52 five dollars for each violation for the failure to respond to a notice 53 of liability within the prescribed time period. 54 (f) An imposition of liability under the demonstration program estab- 55 lished pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a conviction as an 56 operator and shall not be made part of the operating record of the S. 1891--A 5 1 person upon whom such liability is imposed nor shall it be used for 2 insurance purposes in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage. 3 (g) 1. A notice of liability shall be sent by first class mail to each 4 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of a street 5 cleaning parking rule. Personal delivery on the owner shall not be 6 required. A manual or automatic record of mailing prepared in the ordi- 7 nary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of the facts 8 contained therein. 9 2. A notice of liability shall contain the name and address of the 10 person alleged to be liable as an owner for violation of a street clean- 11 ing parking rule, the registration number of the vehicle involved in 12 such violation, the location where such violation took place including 13 the street or cross streets, one or more images identifying the 14 violation, the date and time of such violation and the identification 15 number of the street cleaning vehicle photo device that recorded the 16 violation or other document locator number. 17 3. The notice of liability shall contain information advising the 18 person charged of the manner and the time in which such person may 19 contest the liability alleged in the notice. Such notice of liability 20 shall also contain a warning to advise the person charged that failure 21 to contest in the manner and time provided shall be deemed an admission 22 of liability and that a default judgment may be entered thereon. 23 4. The notice of liability shall be prepared and mailed by an agency 24 or agencies designated by the city of New York, or any other entity 25 authorized by such city to prepare and mail such notification of 26 violation. 27 5. Adjudication of the liability imposed upon owners by this section 28 shall be by the New York city parking violations bureau. 29 (h) If an owner of a vehicle receives a notice of liability pursuant 30 to this section for any time period during which the vehicle was 31 reported to the police department as having been stolen, it shall be a 32 valid defense to an allegation of liability for violation of a street 33 cleaning parking rule of such city, that the vehicle had been reported 34 to the police as stolen prior to the time the violation occurred and had 35 not been recovered by such time. For purposes of asserting the defense 36 provided by this subdivision it shall be sufficient that a certified 37 copy of the police report on the stolen vehicle be sent by first class 38 mail to the parking violations bureau. 39 (i) 1. An owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a notice of 40 liability was issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section shall 41 not be liable for the violation of the street cleaning parking rule, 42 provided that: 43 (i) prior to the violation, the lessor has filed with such parking 44 violations bureau in accordance with the provisions of section two 45 hundred thirty-nine of this chapter; and 46 (ii) within thirty-seven days after receiving notice from such bureau 47 of the date and time of such liability, together with the other informa- 48 tion contained in the original notice of liability, the lessor submits 49 to such bureau the correct name and address of the lessee of the vehicle 50 identified in the notice of liability at the time of such violation, 51 together with such other additional information contained in the rental, 52 lease or other contract document, as may be reasonably required by such 53 bureau pursuant to regulations that may be promulgated for such purpose. 54 2. Failure to comply with subparagraph (ii) of paragraph one of this 55 subdivision shall render the lessor liable for the penalty prescribed in 56 this section. S. 1891--A 6 1 3. Where the lessor complies with the provisions of paragraph one of 2 this subdivision, the lessee of such vehicle on the date of such 3 violation shall be deemed to be the owner of such vehicle for purposes 4 of this section, shall be subject to liability for such violation pursu- 5 ant to this section, and shall be sent a notice of liability pursuant to 6 subdivision (g) of this section. 7 (j) 1. If the owner liable for a violation of a street cleaning park- 8 ing rule pursuant to this section was not the operator of the vehicle 9 at the time of such violation, the owner may maintain an action for 10 indemnification against the operator. 11 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no owner of a 12 vehicle shall be subject to a monetary fine imposed pursuant to this 13 section if the operator of such vehicle was operating such vehicle with- 14 out the consent of the owner at the time such operator failed to obey a 15 street cleaning parking rule. For purposes of this subdivision there 16 shall be a presumption that the operator of such vehicle was operating 17 such vehicle with the consent of the owner at the time such operator 18 failed to obey a street cleaning parking rule. 19 (k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability 20 of an operator of a vehicle for any violation of a street cleaning park- 21 ing rule. 22 (l) If the city of New York adopts a demonstration program pursuant to 23 subdivision (a) of this section, such city's department of sanitation 24 shall submit a report on the results of the use of street cleaning park- 25 ing rule-related photo devices to the governor, the temporary president 26 of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly by April first, two thou- 27 sand twenty-nine and every two years thereafter. The department of 28 sanitation of the city of New York shall also make such reports avail- 29 able on their public-facing websites, provided that they may provide 30 aggregate data from paragraph one of this subdivision if the city finds 31 that publishing specific location data would jeopardize public safety. 32 Such report shall include, but not be limited to: 33 1. a description of the locations and/or vehicles where street clean- 34 ing vehicle photo devices were used; 35 2. the total number of violations recorded on a monthly and annual 36 basis; 37 3. the total number of notices of liability issued; 38 4. the number of fines and total amount of fines paid after the first 39 notice of liability; 40 5. the number of violations adjudicated and results of such adjudi- 41 cations including breakdowns of dispositions made; 42 6. the total amount of revenue realized by such city and department; 43 7. the quality of the adjudication process and its results; 44 8. the total number of cameras; 45 9. the total cost to such city; and 46 10. an assessment by the New York city department of sanitation of 47 the efficacy of the program in enabling such department to clean the 48 city's streets. 49 (m) It shall be a defense to any prosecution for a violation of a 50 street cleaning parking rule pursuant to a demonstration program adopted 51 pursuant to this section that such street cleaning vehicle photo devices 52 were malfunctioning at the time of the alleged violation. 53 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 235 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 54 amended by section 1 of part N of chapter 58 of the laws of 2025, is 55 amended to read as follows: S. 1891--A 7 1 1. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of any general, special 2 or local law or administrative code to the contrary, in any city which 3 heretofore or hereafter is authorized to establish an administrative 4 tribunal: (a) to hear and determine complaints of traffic infractions 5 constituting parking, standing or stopping violations, or (b) to adjudi- 6 cate the liability of owners for violations of subdivision (d) of 7 section eleven hundred eleven of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 8 local law or ordinance imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 9 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with traffic-con- 10 trol indications through the installation and operation of traffic-con- 11 trol signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance with arti- 12 cle twenty-four of this chapter, or (c) to adjudicate the liability of 13 owners for violations of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 14 section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 15 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 16 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such posted 17 maximum speed limits through the installation and operation of photo 18 speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of 19 this chapter, or (d) to adjudicate the liability of owners for 20 violations of bus lane restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of 21 this chapter imposed pursuant to a bus rapid transit program imposing 22 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 23 thereof to comply with such bus lane restrictions through the installa- 24 tion and operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article 25 twenty-four of this chapter, or (e) to adjudicate the liability of 26 owners for violations of toll collection regulations imposed by certain 27 public authorities pursuant to the law authorizing such public authori- 28 ties to impose monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure 29 of an operator thereof to comply with toll collection regulations of 30 such public authorities through the installation and operation of 31 photo-monitoring systems, in accordance with the provisions of section 32 two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of the public authorities law and 33 sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred 34 seventy-four of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty, or (f) to adjudicate 35 the liability of owners for violations of section eleven hundred seven- 36 ty-four of this chapter when meeting a school bus marked and equipped as 37 provided in subdivisions twenty and twenty-one-c of section three 38 hundred seventy-five of this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or 39 ordinance imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for 40 failure of an operator thereof to comply with school bus red visual 41 signals through the installation and operation of school bus photo 42 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-nine of 43 this chapter, or (g) to adjudicate the liability of owners for 44 violations of section three hundred eighty-five of this chapter and the 45 rules of the applicable covered agency or covered authority as such 46 terms are defined in article ten of this chapter in relation to gross 47 vehicle weight and/or axle weight violations imposed pursuant to a weigh 48 in motion demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner 49 of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such 50 gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight restrictions through the instal- 51 lation and operation of weigh in motion violation monitoring systems, in 52 accordance with article ten of this chapter, or (h) to adjudicate the 53 liability of owners for violations of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) 54 of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 55 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 56 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such posted S. 1891--A 8 1 maximum speed limits within a highway construction or maintenance work 2 area through the installation and operation of photo speed violation 3 monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this chapter, 4 or (i) to adjudicate the liability of owners for violations of bus oper- 5 ation-related traffic regulations as defined by article twenty-four of 6 this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing mone- 7 tary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 8 thereof to comply with such bus operation-related traffic regulations 9 through the installation and operation of bus operation-related photo 10 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, or (j) 11 to adjudicate the liability of owners for violations of street cleaning 12 parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed 13 pursuant to a program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 14 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such street 15 cleaning parking rules through the installation and operation of street 16 cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four 17 of this chapter, such tribunal and the rules and regulations pertaining 18 thereto shall be constituted in substantial conformance with the follow- 19 ing sections. 20 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 236 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 21 amended by section 2 of part N of chapter 58 of the laws of 2025, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 1. Creation. In any city as hereinbefore or hereafter authorized such 24 tribunal when created shall be known as the parking violations bureau 25 and shall have jurisdiction of traffic infractions which constitute a 26 parking violation and, where authorized: (a) to adjudicate the liability 27 of owners for violations of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred 28 eleven of this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance 29 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 30 operator thereof to comply with traffic-control indications through the 31 installation and operation of traffic-control signal photo violation- 32 monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chap- 33 ter, or (b) to adjudicate the liability of owners for violations of 34 subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty 35 of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing 36 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 37 thereof to comply with such posted maximum speed limits through the 38 installation and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, 39 in accordance with article thirty of this chapter, or (c) to adjudicate 40 the liability of owners for violations of bus lane restrictions as 41 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a bus 42 rapid transit program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 43 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus lane 44 restrictions through the installation and operation of bus lane photo 45 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, or (d) 46 to adjudicate the liability of owners for violations of toll collection 47 regulations imposed by certain public authorities pursuant to the law 48 authorizing such public authorities to impose monetary liability on the 49 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 50 toll collection regulations of such public authorities through the 51 installation and operation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance 52 with the provisions of section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of 53 the public authorities law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and 54 sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen 55 hundred fifty, or (e) to adjudicate the liability of owners for 56 violations of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter when S. 1891--A 9 1 meeting a school bus marked and equipped as provided in subdivisions 2 twenty and twenty-one-c of section three hundred seventy-five of this 3 chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing monetary 4 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 5 to comply with school bus red visual signals through the installation 6 and operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, in 7 accordance with article twenty-nine of this chapter, or (f) to adjudi- 8 cate the liability of owners for violations of section three hundred 9 eighty-five of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered 10 agency or covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of 11 this chapter in relation to gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight 12 violations imposed pursuant to a weigh in motion demonstration program 13 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 14 operator thereof to comply with such gross vehicle weight and/or axle 15 weight restrictions through the installation and operation of weigh in 16 motion violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of 17 this chapter, or (g) to adjudicate the liability of owners for 18 violations of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 19 eighty of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program 20 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 21 operator thereof to comply with such posted maximum speed limits within 22 a highway construction or maintenance work area through the installation 23 and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance 24 with article thirty of this chapter, or (h) to adjudicate the liability 25 of owners for violations of bus operation-related traffic regulations as 26 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 27 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 28 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus oper- 29 ation-related traffic regulations through the installation and operation 30 of bus operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article twen- 31 ty-four of this chapter, or (i) to adjudicate the liability of owners 32 for violations of street cleaning parking rules as defined by article 33 twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a program imposing mone- 34 tary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 35 thereof to comply with such street cleaning parking rules through the 36 installation and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo devices, in 37 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter. Such tribunal, 38 except in a city with a population of one million or more, shall also 39 have jurisdiction of abandoned vehicle violations. For the purposes of 40 this article, a parking violation is the violation of any law, rule or 41 regulation providing for or regulating the parking, stopping or standing 42 of a vehicle. In addition for purposes of this article, "commissioner" 43 shall mean and include the commissioner of traffic of the city or an 44 official possessing authority as such a commissioner. 45 § 4. Paragraph f of subdivision 1 of section 239 of the vehicle and 46 traffic law, as amended by section 3 of part N of chapter 58 of the laws 47 of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 48 f. "Notice of violation" means a notice of violation as defined in 49 subdivision nine of section two hundred thirty-seven of this article, 50 but shall not be deemed to include a notice of liability issued pursuant 51 to authorization set forth in articles ten, twenty-four, twenty-nine and 52 thirty of this chapter, section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of 53 the public authorities law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and 54 sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen 55 hundred fifty to impose monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for 56 failure of an operator thereof: to comply with traffic-control indi- S. 1891--A 10 1 cations in violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven 2 of this chapter through the installation and operation of traffic-con- 3 trol signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance with arti- 4 cle twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with certain posted maxi- 5 mum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) 6 of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter through the installa- 7 tion and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in 8 accordance with article thirty of this chapter; or to comply with bus 9 lane restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter 10 through the installation and operation of bus lane photo devices, in 11 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with 12 toll collection regulations of certain public authorities through the 13 installation and operation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance 14 with the provisions of section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of 15 the public authorities law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and 16 sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen 17 hundred fifty; or to stop for a school bus displaying a red visual 18 signal in violation of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chap- 19 ter through the installation and operation of school bus photo violation 20 monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-nine of this chap- 21 ter; or to comply with certain posted maximum speed limits in violation 22 of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of 23 this chapter within a highway construction or maintenance work area 24 through the installation and operation of photo speed violation monitor- 25 ing systems, in accordance with article thirty of this chapter; or to 26 comply with gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight restrictions in 27 violation of section three hundred eighty-five of this chapter and the 28 rules of the applicable covered agency or covered authority as such 29 terms are defined in article ten of this chapter through the installa- 30 tion and operation of weigh in motion violation monitoring systems, in 31 accordance with article ten of this chapter; or to comply with bus oper- 32 ation-related traffic regulations as defined by article twenty-four of 33 this chapter in violation of the rules of the department of transporta- 34 tion of the city of New York through the installation and operation of 35 bus operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article twenty- 36 four of this chapter; or to comply with street cleaning parking rules as 37 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter through the installation 38 and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance 39 with article twenty-four of this chapter. 40 § 5. Subdivisions 1, 1-a and the opening paragraph of paragraph (a) of 41 subdivision 1-b of section 240 of the vehicle and traffic law, subdivi- 42 sions 1 and 1-a as amended by section 4 of part N of chapter 58 of the 43 laws of 2025, and the opening paragraph of paragraph (a) of subdivision 44 1-b as amended by section 5 of part MM of chapter 56 of the laws of 45 2023, are amended to read as follows: 46 1. Notice of hearing. Whenever a person charged with a parking 47 violation enters a plea of not guilty; or a person alleged to be liable 48 in accordance with any provisions of law specifically authorizing the 49 imposition of monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure 50 of an operator thereof: to comply with traffic-control indications in 51 violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of this 52 chapter through the installation and operation of traffic-control signal 53 photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty- 54 four of this chapter; or to comply with certain posted maximum speed 55 limits in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section 56 eleven hundred eighty of this chapter through the installation and oper- S. 1891--A 11 1 ation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with 2 article thirty of this chapter; or to comply with bus lane restrictions 3 as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter through the installa- 4 tion and operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article 5 twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with toll collection regu- 6 lations of certain public authorities through the installation and oper- 7 ation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance with the provisions of 8 section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of the public authorities 9 law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter seven 10 hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty; or to stop 11 for a school bus displaying a red visual signal in violation of section 12 eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter through the installation and 13 operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, in accord- 14 ance with article twenty-nine of this chapter; or to comply with certain 15 posted maximum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or 16 (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter within a highway 17 construction or maintenance work area through the installation and oper- 18 ation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with 19 article thirty of this chapter; or to comply with gross vehicle weight 20 and/or axle weight restrictions in violation of section three hundred 21 eighty-five of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered 22 agency or covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of 23 this chapter through the installation and operation of weigh in motion 24 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this 25 chapter; or to comply with bus operation-related traffic regulations as 26 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter in violation of the rules 27 of the department of transportation of the city of New York through the 28 installation and operation of bus operation-related photo devices, in 29 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with 30 street cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this 31 chapter through the installation and operation of street cleaning vehi- 32 cle photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chap- 33 ter, contests such allegation, the bureau shall advise such person 34 personally by such form of first class mail as the director may direct 35 of the date on which such person must appear to answer the charge at a 36 hearing. The form and content of such notice of hearing shall be 37 prescribed by the director, and shall contain a warning to advise the 38 person so pleading or contesting that failure to appear on the date 39 designated, or on any subsequent adjourned date, shall be deemed an 40 admission of liability, and that a default judgment may be entered ther- 41 eon. 42 1-a. Fines and penalties. Whenever a plea of not guilty has been 43 entered, or the bureau has been notified that an allegation of liability 44 in accordance with provisions of law specifically authorizing the impo- 45 sition of monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 46 operator thereof: to comply with traffic-control indications in 47 violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of this 48 chapter through the installation and operation of traffic-control signal 49 photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty- 50 four of this chapter; or to comply with certain posted maximum speed 51 limits in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section 52 eleven hundred eighty of this chapter through the installation and oper- 53 ation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with 54 article thirty of this chapter; or to comply with bus lane restrictions 55 as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter through the installa- 56 tion and operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article S. 1891--A 12 1 twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with toll collection regu- 2 lations of certain public authorities through the installation and oper- 3 ation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance with the provisions of 4 section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of the public authorities 5 law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter seven 6 hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty; or to stop 7 for a school bus displaying a red visual signal in violation of section 8 eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter through the installation and 9 operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, in accord- 10 ance with article twenty-nine of this chapter; or to comply with certain 11 posted maximum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or 12 (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter within a highway 13 construction or maintenance work area through the installation and oper- 14 ation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with 15 article thirty of this chapter; or to comply with gross vehicle weight 16 and/or axle weight restrictions in violation of section three hundred 17 eighty-five of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered 18 agency or covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of 19 this chapter through the installation and operation of weigh in motion 20 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this 21 chapter; or to comply with bus operation-related traffic regulations as 22 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter in violation of the rules 23 of the department of transportation of the city of New York through the 24 installation and operation of bus operation-related photo devices, in 25 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, or to comply with 26 street cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this 27 chapter through the installation and operation of street cleaning vehi- 28 cle photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chap- 29 ter, is being contested, by a person in a timely fashion and a hearing 30 upon the merits has been demanded, but has not yet been held, the bureau 31 shall not issue any notice of fine or penalty to that person prior to 32 the date of the hearing. 33 In a city having a population of one million or more, at every hearing 34 for the adjudication of a notice of liability, as provided by this arti- 35 cle, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the owner of a first- 36 response emergency vehicle alleged to be liable in accordance with any 37 provisions of law specifically authorizing the imposition of monetary 38 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof: 39 to comply with traffic-control indications in violation of subdivision 40 (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of this chapter through the instal- 41 lation and operation of traffic-control signal photo violation-monitor- 42 ing systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or 43 to comply with certain posted maximum speed limits in violation of 44 subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty 45 of this chapter through the installation and operation of photo speed 46 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this 47 chapter; or to comply with bus lane restrictions as defined by article 48 twenty-four of this chapter through the installation and operation of 49 bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this 50 chapter; or to comply with bus operation-related traffic regulations as 51 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter in violation of the rules 52 of the department of transportation of the city of New York through the 53 installation and operation of bus operation-related photo devices, in 54 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with 55 street cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this 56 chapter through the installation and operation of street cleaning S. 1891--A 13 1 vehicle photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this 2 chapter is not liable for such alleged violation if such owner of the 3 first-response emergency vehicle provides the hearing officer with: 4 § 6. Paragraphs a and g of subdivision 2 of section 240 of the vehicle 5 and traffic law, as amended by section 5 of part N of chapter 58 of the 6 laws of 2025, are amended to read as follows: 7 a. Every hearing for the adjudication of a charge of parking violation 8 or an allegation of liability of an owner for a violation of subdivision 9 (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of this chapter imposed pursuant to 10 a local law or ordinance imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 11 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with traffic-con- 12 trol indications through the installation and operation of traffic-con- 13 trol signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance with arti- 14 cle twenty-four of this chapter, or an allegation of liability of an 15 owner for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 16 section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 17 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 18 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with certain posted 19 maximum speed limits through the installation and operation of photo 20 speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of 21 this chapter, or an allegation of liability of an owner for a violation 22 of bus lane restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of this chap- 23 ter imposed pursuant to a bus rapid transit program imposing monetary 24 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 25 to comply with such bus lane restrictions through the installation and 26 operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article twenty- 27 four of this chapter, or an allegation of liability of an owner for a 28 violation of toll collection regulations imposed by certain public 29 authorities pursuant to the law authorizing such public authorities to 30 impose monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 31 operator thereof to comply with toll collection regulations of such 32 public authorities through the installation and operation of photo-moni- 33 toring systems, in accordance with the provisions of section two thou- 34 sand nine hundred eighty-five of the public authorities law and sections 35 sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four 36 of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty, or an allegation of liability of 37 an owner for a violation of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this 38 chapter when meeting a school bus marked and equipped as provided in 39 subdivisions twenty and twenty-one-c of section three hundred seventy- 40 five of this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance impos- 41 ing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an oper- 42 ator thereof to comply with school bus red visual signals through the 43 installation and operation of school bus photo violation monitoring 44 systems, in accordance with article twenty-nine of this chapter, or an 45 allegation of liability of an owner for a violation of subdivision (b), 46 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed 47 pursuant to a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the 48 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 49 certain posted maximum speed limits within a highway construction or 50 maintenance work area through the installation and operation of photo 51 speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of 52 this chapter, or an allegation of liability of an owner for a violation 53 of section three hundred eighty-five of this chapter and the rules of 54 the applicable covered agency or covered authority as such terms are 55 defined in article ten of this chapter in relation to gross vehicle 56 weight and/or axle weight violations imposed pursuant to a weigh in S. 1891--A 14 1 motion demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of 2 a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such gross 3 vehicle weight and/or axle weight restrictions through the installation 4 and operation of weigh in motion violation monitoring systems, in 5 accordance with article ten of this chapter, or an allegation of liabil- 6 ity of an owner for a violation of bus operation-related traffic regu- 7 lations as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursu- 8 ant to a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner 9 of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus 10 operation-related traffic regulations through the installation and oper- 11 ation of bus operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article 12 twenty-four of this chapter, or an allegation of liability of an owner 13 for a violation of street cleaning parking rules as defined by article 14 twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a program imposing mone- 15 tary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 16 thereof to comply with such street cleaning parking rules through the 17 installation and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo devices, in 18 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, shall be held 19 before a hearing examiner in accordance with rules and regulations 20 promulgated by the bureau. 21 g. A record shall be made of a hearing on a plea of not guilty or of a 22 hearing at which liability in accordance with any provisions of law 23 specifically authorizing the imposition of monetary liability on the 24 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof: to comply with 25 traffic-control indications in violation of subdivision (d) of section 26 eleven hundred eleven of this chapter through the installation and oper- 27 ation of traffic-control signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in 28 accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; to comply with 29 certain posted maximum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), 30 (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter 31 through the installation and operation of photo speed violation monitor- 32 ing systems, in accordance with article thirty of this chapter; to 33 comply with bus lane restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of 34 this chapter through the installation and operation of bus lane photo 35 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; to 36 comply with toll collection regulations of certain public authorities 37 through the installation and operation of photo-monitoring systems, in 38 accordance with the provisions of section two thousand nine hundred 39 eighty-five of the public authorities law and sections sixteen-a, 40 sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four of the 41 laws of nineteen hundred fifty; to stop for a school bus displaying a 42 red visual signal in violation of section eleven hundred seventy-four of 43 this chapter through the installation and operation of school bus photo 44 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-nine of 45 this chapter; to comply with certain posted maximum speed limits in 46 violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 47 eighty of this chapter within a highway construction or maintenance work 48 area through the installation and operation of photo speed violation 49 monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this chapter; 50 to comply with gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight restrictions in 51 violation of section three hundred eighty-five of this chapter and the 52 rules of the applicable covered agency or covered authority as such 53 terms are defined in article ten of this chapter through the installa- 54 tion and operation of weigh in motion violation monitoring systems, in 55 accordance with article ten of this chapter; or to comply with bus oper- 56 ation-related traffic regulations as defined by article twenty-four of S. 1891--A 15 1 this chapter in violation of the rules of the department of transporta- 2 tion of the city of New York through the installation and operation of 3 bus operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article twenty- 4 four of this chapter; or to comply with street cleaning parking rules as 5 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter through the installation 6 and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance 7 with article twenty-four of this chapter, is contested. Recording 8 devices may be used for the making of the record. 9 § 7. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 241 of the vehicle and traffic 10 law, as amended by section 6 of part N of chapter 58 of the laws of 11 2025, are amended to read as follows: 12 1. The hearing examiner shall make a determination on the charges, 13 either sustaining or dismissing them. Where the hearing examiner deter- 14 mines that the charges have been sustained such hearing examiner may 15 examine either the prior parking violations record or the record of 16 liabilities incurred in accordance with any provisions of law specif- 17 ically authorizing the imposition of monetary liability on the owner of 18 a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof: to comply with traffic- 19 control indications in violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven 20 hundred eleven of this chapter through the installation and operation of 21 traffic-control signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance 22 with article twenty-four of this chapter; to comply with certain posted 23 maximum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or 24 (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter through the instal- 25 lation and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in 26 accordance with article thirty of this chapter; to comply with bus lane 27 restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter through 28 the installation and operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance 29 with article twenty-four of this chapter; to comply with toll collection 30 regulations of certain public authorities through the installation and 31 operation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance with the provisions 32 of section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of the public authori- 33 ties law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter 34 seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty; to 35 stop for a school bus displaying a red visual signal in violation of 36 section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter through the instal- 37 lation and operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, 38 in accordance with article twenty-nine of this chapter; to comply with 39 certain posted maximum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), 40 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter within 41 a highway construction or maintenance work area through the installation 42 and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance 43 with article thirty of this chapter; to comply with gross vehicle weight 44 and/or axle weight restrictions in violation of section three hundred 45 eighty-five of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered 46 agency or covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of 47 this chapter through the installation and operation of weigh in motion 48 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this 49 chapter; [or] to comply with bus operation-related traffic regulations 50 as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter in violation of the 51 rules of the department of transportation of the city of New York 52 through the installation and operation of bus operation-related photo 53 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or to 54 comply with street cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty- 55 four of this chapter through the installation and operation of street 56 cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four S. 1891--A 16 1 of this chapter, of the person charged, as applicable prior to rendering 2 a final determination. Final determinations sustaining or dismissing 3 charges shall be entered on a final determination roll maintained by the 4 bureau together with records showing payment and nonpayment of penal- 5 ties. 6 2. Where an operator or owner fails to enter a plea to a charge of a 7 parking violation or contest an allegation of liability in accordance 8 with any provisions of law specifically authorizing the imposition of 9 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 10 thereof: to comply with traffic-control indications in violation of 11 subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of this chapter through 12 the installation and operation of traffic-control signal photo viola- 13 tion-monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this 14 chapter; to comply with certain posted maximum speed limits in violation 15 of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 16 eighty of this chapter through the installation and operation of photo 17 speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of 18 this chapter; to comply with bus lane restrictions as defined by article 19 twenty-four of this chapter through the installation and operation of 20 bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this 21 chapter; to comply with toll collection regulations of certain public 22 authorities through the installation and operation of photo-monitoring 23 systems, in accordance with the provisions of section two thousand nine 24 hundred eighty-five of the public authorities law and sections 25 sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four 26 of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty; to stop for a school bus display- 27 ing a red visual signal in violation of section eleven hundred seventy- 28 four of this chapter through the installation and operation of school 29 bus photo violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article twen- 30 ty-nine of this chapter; to comply with certain posted maximum speed 31 limits in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section elev- 32 en hundred eighty of this chapter within a highway construction or main- 33 tenance work area through the installation and operation of photo speed 34 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this 35 chapter; to comply with gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight 36 restrictions in violation of section three hundred eighty-five of this 37 chapter and the rules of the applicable covered agency or covered 38 authority as such terms are defined in article ten of this chapter 39 through the installation and operation of weigh in motion violation 40 monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this chapter; [or] 41 to comply with bus operation-related traffic regulations as defined by 42 article twenty-four of this chapter in violation of the rules of the 43 department of transportation of the city of New York through the instal- 44 lation and operation of bus operation-related photo devices, in accord- 45 ance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with street 46 cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter 47 through the installation and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo 48 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, or 49 fails to appear on a designated hearing date or subsequent adjourned 50 date or fails after a hearing to comply with the determination of a 51 hearing examiner, as prescribed by this article or by rule or regulation 52 of the bureau, such failure to plead or contest, appear or comply shall 53 be deemed, for all purposes, an admission of liability and shall be 54 grounds for rendering and entering a default judgment in an amount 55 provided by the rules and regulations of the bureau. However, after the 56 expiration of the original date prescribed for entering a plea and S. 1891--A 17 1 before a default judgment may be rendered, in such case the bureau shall 2 pursuant to the applicable provisions of law notify such operator or 3 owner, by such form of first class mail as the commission may direct; 4 (1) of the violation charged, or liability alleged in accordance with 5 any provisions of law specifically authorizing the imposition of mone- 6 tary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 7 thereof: to comply with traffic-control indications in violation of 8 subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of this chapter through 9 the installation and operation of traffic-control signal photo viola- 10 tion-monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this 11 chapter; to comply with certain posted maximum speed limits in violation 12 of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 13 eighty of this chapter through the installation and operation of photo 14 speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of 15 this chapter; to comply with bus lane restrictions as defined by article 16 twenty-four of this chapter through the installation and operation of 17 bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this 18 chapter; to comply with toll collection regulations of certain public 19 authorities through the installation and operation of photo-monitoring 20 systems, in accordance with the provisions of section two thousand nine 21 hundred eighty-five of the public authorities law and sections 22 sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four 23 of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty; to stop for a school bus display- 24 ing a red visual signal in violation of section eleven hundred seventy- 25 four of this chapter through the installation and operation of school 26 bus photo violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article twen- 27 ty-nine of this chapter; to comply with certain posted maximum speed 28 limits in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section elev- 29 en hundred eighty of this chapter within a highway construction or main- 30 tenance work area through the installation and operation of photo speed 31 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this 32 chapter; to comply with gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight 33 restrictions in violation of section three hundred eighty-five of this 34 chapter and the rules of the applicable covered agency or covered 35 authority as such terms are defined in article ten of this chapter 36 through the installation and operation of weigh in motion violation 37 monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this chapter; [or] 38 to comply with bus operation-related traffic regulations as defined by 39 article twenty-four of this chapter in violation of the rules of the 40 department of transportation of the city of New York through the instal- 41 lation and operation of bus operation-related photo devices, in accord- 42 ance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or to comply with street 43 cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter 44 through the installation and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo 45 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, (2) of 46 the impending default judgment, (3) that such judgment will be entered 47 in the Civil Court of the city in which the bureau has been established, 48 or other court of civil jurisdiction or any other place provided for the 49 entry of civil judgments within the state of New York, and (4) that a 50 default may be avoided by entering a plea or contesting an allegation of 51 liability in accordance with any provisions of law specifically author- 52 izing the imposition of monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for 53 failure of an operator thereof: to comply with traffic-control indi- 54 cations in violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven 55 of this chapter through the installation and operation of traffic-con- 56 trol signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance with arti- S. 1891--A 18 1 cle twenty-four of this chapter; to comply with certain posted maximum 2 speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 3 section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter through the installation 4 and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance 5 with article thirty of this chapter; to comply with bus lane 6 restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter through 7 the installation and operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance 8 with article twenty-four of this chapter; to comply with toll collection 9 regulations of certain public authorities through the installation and 10 operation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance with the provisions 11 of section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of the public authori- 12 ties law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter 13 seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty; to 14 stop for a school bus displaying a red visual signal in violation of 15 section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter through the instal- 16 lation and operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, 17 in accordance with article twenty-nine of this chapter; to comply with 18 certain posted maximum speed limits in violation of subdivision (b), 19 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter within 20 a highway construction or maintenance work area through the installation 21 and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance 22 with article thirty of this chapter; to comply with gross vehicle weight 23 and/or axle weight restrictions in violation of section three hundred 24 eighty-five of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered 25 agency or covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of 26 this chapter through the installation and operation of weigh in motion 27 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this 28 chapter; [or] to comply with bus operation-related traffic regulations 29 as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter in violation of the 30 rules of the department of transportation of the city of New York 31 through the installation and operation of bus operation-related photo 32 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; or to 33 comply with street cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty- 34 four of this chapter through the installation and operation of street 35 cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four 36 of this chapter; or making an appearance within thirty days of the send- 37 ing of such notice. Pleas entered and allegations contested within that 38 period shall be in the manner prescribed in the notice and not subject 39 to additional penalty or fee. Such notice of impending default judgment 40 shall not be required prior to the rendering and entry thereof in the 41 case of operators or owners who are non-residents of the state of New 42 York. In no case shall a default judgment be rendered or, where 43 required, a notice of impending default judgment be sent, more than two 44 years after the expiration of the time prescribed for entering a plea or 45 contesting an allegation. When a person has demanded a hearing, no fine 46 or penalty shall be imposed for any reason, prior to the holding of the 47 hearing. If the hearing examiner shall make a determination on the 48 charges, sustaining them, such hearing examiner shall impose no greater 49 penalty or fine than those upon which the person was originally charged. 50 § 8. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph a of subdivision 5-a of section 401 51 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by section 7 of part N of 52 chapter 58 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 53 (i) If at the time of application for a registration or renewal there- 54 of there is a certification from a court, parking violations bureau, 55 traffic and parking violations agency or administrative tribunal of 56 appropriate jurisdiction that the registrant or their representative S. 1891--A 19 1 failed to appear on the return date or any subsequent adjourned date or 2 failed to comply with the rules and regulations of an administrative 3 tribunal following entry of a final decision in response to a total of 4 three or more summonses or other process in the aggregate, issued within 5 an eighteen month period, charging either that: (i) such motor vehicle 6 was parked, stopped or standing, or that such motor vehicle was operated 7 for hire by the registrant or their agent without being licensed as a 8 motor vehicle for hire by the appropriate local authority, in violation 9 of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any law, ordinance, rule 10 or regulation made by a local authority; or (ii) the registrant was 11 liable for a violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred 12 eleven of this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance 13 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 14 operator thereof to comply with traffic-control indications through the 15 installation and operation of traffic-control signal photo violation- 16 monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chap- 17 ter; or (iii) the registrant was liable for a violation of subdivision 18 (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chap- 19 ter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing monetary 20 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 21 to comply with such posted maximum speed limits through the installation 22 and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance 23 with article thirty of this chapter; or (iv) the registrant was liable 24 for a violation of bus lane restrictions as defined by article twenty- 25 four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a bus rapid transit program 26 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 27 operator thereof to comply with such bus lane restrictions through the 28 installation and operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance with 29 article twenty-four of this chapter; or (v) the registrant was liable 30 for a violation of section eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter 31 when meeting a school bus marked and equipped as provided in subdivi- 32 sions twenty and twenty-one-c of section three hundred seventy-five of 33 this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing mone- 34 tary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 35 thereof to comply with school bus red visual signals through the instal- 36 lation and operation of school bus photo violation monitoring systems, 37 in accordance with article twenty-nine of this chapter; or (vi) the 38 registrant was liable for a violation of section three hundred eighty- 39 five of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered agency or 40 covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of this chap- 41 ter in relation to gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight violations 42 imposed pursuant to a weigh in motion demonstration program imposing 43 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 44 thereof to comply with such gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight 45 restrictions through the installation and operation of weigh in motion 46 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this 47 chapter; or (vii) the registrant was liable for a violation of subdivi- 48 sion (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chap- 49 ter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing monetary 50 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 51 to comply with such posted maximum speed limits within a highway 52 construction or maintenance work area through the installation and oper- 53 ation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, in accordance with 54 article thirty of this chapter[,]; or (viii) the registrant was liable 55 for a violation of bus operation-related traffic regulations as defined 56 by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demon- S. 1891--A 20 1 stration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle 2 for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus operation-re- 3 lated traffic regulations through the installation and operation of bus 4 operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four 5 of this chapter[,]; or (ix) the registrant was liable for a violation of 6 street cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this 7 chapter imposed pursuant to a program imposing monetary liability on the 8 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 9 such street cleaning parking rules through the installation and opera- 10 tion of street cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance with arti- 11 cle twenty-four of this chapter, the commissioner or their agent shall 12 deny the registration or renewal application until the applicant 13 provides proof from the court, traffic and parking violations agency or 14 administrative tribunal wherein the charges are pending that an appear- 15 ance or answer has been made or in the case of an administrative tribu- 16 nal that such applicant has complied with the rules and regulations of 17 said tribunal following entry of a final decision. Where an application 18 is denied pursuant to this section, the commissioner may, in their 19 discretion, deny a registration or renewal application to any other 20 person for the same vehicle and may deny a registration or renewal 21 application for any other motor vehicle registered in the name of the 22 applicant where the commissioner has determined that such registrant's 23 intent has been to evade the purposes of this subdivision and where the 24 commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that such registration or 25 renewal will have the effect of defeating the purposes of this subdivi- 26 sion. Such denial shall only remain in effect as long as the summonses 27 remain unanswered, or in the case of an administrative tribunal, the 28 registrant fails to comply with the rules and regulations following 29 entry of a final decision. 30 § 9. Subdivision 1-a of section 1809 of the vehicle and traffic law, 31 as amended by section 8 of part N of chapter 58 of the laws of 2025, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 1-a. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this 34 section, the provisions of subdivision one of this section shall not 35 apply to an adjudication of liability of owners: (a) for violations of 36 subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred eleven of this chapter imposed 37 pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing monetary liability on the 38 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with 39 traffic-control indications through the installation and operation of 40 traffic-control signal photo violation-monitoring systems, in accordance 41 with article twenty-four of this chapter; or (b) for violations of 42 subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty 43 of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing 44 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 45 thereof to comply with such posted maximum speed limits through the 46 installation and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, 47 in accordance with article thirty of this chapter; or (c) for violations 48 of bus lane restrictions as defined by article twenty-four of this chap- 49 ter imposed pursuant to a bus rapid transit program imposing monetary 50 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 51 to comply with such bus lane restrictions through the installation and 52 operation of bus lane photo devices, in accordance with article twenty- 53 four of this chapter; or (d) for violations of toll collection regu- 54 lations imposed by certain public authorities pursuant to the law 55 authorizing such public authorities to impose monetary liability on the 56 owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with S. 1891--A 21 1 toll collection regulations of such public authorities through the 2 installation and operation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance 3 with the provisions of section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of 4 the public authorities law and sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and 5 sixteen-c of chapter seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen 6 hundred fifty; or (e) for violations of section eleven hundred seventy- 7 four of this chapter when meeting a school bus marked and equipped as 8 provided in subdivisions twenty and twenty-one-c of section three 9 hundred seventy-five of this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or 10 ordinance imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for 11 failure of an operator thereof to comply with school bus red visual 12 signals through the installation and operation of school bus photo 13 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty-nine of 14 this chapter; or (f) for violations of section three hundred eighty-five 15 of this chapter and the rules of the applicable covered agency or 16 covered authority as such terms are defined in article ten of this chap- 17 ter in relation to gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight violations 18 imposed pursuant to a weigh in motion demonstration program imposing 19 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 20 thereof to comply with such gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight 21 restrictions through the installation and operation of weigh in motion 22 violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article ten of this 23 chapter; or (g) for violations of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of 24 section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 25 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 26 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such posted 27 maximum speed limits within a highway construction or maintenance work 28 area through the installation and operation of photo speed violation 29 monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this chapter; 30 or (h) for violations of bus operation-related traffic regulations as 31 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 32 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 33 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus oper- 34 ation-related traffic regulations through the installation and operation 35 of bus operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article twen- 36 ty-four of this chapter; or (i) for violations of street cleaning park- 37 ing rules as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed 38 pursuant to a program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 39 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such street 40 cleaning parking rules through the installation and operation of street 41 cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four 42 of this chapter. 43 § 10. Subdivision 1 of section 1809-a of the vehicle and traffic law, 44 as amended by section 10 of part MM of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, 45 is amended to read as follows: 46 1. The provisions of any other general or special law notwithstanding, 47 whenever, in a city having a population of one hundred thousand or more 48 according to the nineteen hundred eighty United States census, 49 proceedings in an administrative tribunal or a court result in a finding 50 of liability, or conviction for the violation of any statute, local law, 51 ordinance or rule involving the parking, stopping or standing of a motor 52 vehicle, except (a) an adjudication of liability of an owner for a 53 violation of bus operation-related traffic regulations as defined by 54 article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration 55 program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for fail- 56 ure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus operation-related S. 1891--A 22 1 traffic regulations through the installation and operation of bus opera- 2 tion-related photo devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of 3 this chapter, or (b) an adjudication of liability of an owner for a 4 violation of street cleaning parking rules as defined by article twen- 5 ty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a program imposing monetary 6 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 7 to comply with such street cleaning parking rules through the installa- 8 tion and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accord- 9 ance with article twenty-four of this chapter, there shall be levied a 10 mandatory surcharge in addition to any other sentence, fine or penalty 11 otherwise permitted or required, in the amount of fifteen dollars. Such 12 surcharge shall not be deemed a monetary penalty for the purposes of 13 section two hundred thirty-seven of this chapter or section 19-203 of 14 the administrative code of the city of New York. 15 § 11. Subdivision 1 of section 1809-aa of the vehicle and traffic law, 16 as amended by section 11 of part MM of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, 17 is amended to read as follows: 18 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever proceedings in 19 an administrative tribunal or court result in a conviction for a 20 violation of section twelve hundred, twelve hundred one or twelve 21 hundred two of this chapter, except (a) an adjudication of liability of 22 an owner for a violation of bus operation-related traffic regulations as 23 defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 24 demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 25 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus oper- 26 ation-related traffic regulations through the installation and operation 27 of bus operation-related photo devices, in accordance with article twen- 28 ty-four of this chapter, or (b) an adjudication of liability of an 29 owner for a violation of street cleaning parking rules as defined by 30 article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a program 31 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure 32 of an operator thereof to comply with such street cleaning parking rules 33 through the installation and operation of street cleaning vehicle photo 34 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter, there 35 shall be levied a mandatory surcharge in addition to any other sentence, 36 fine or penalty otherwise permitted or required, in the amount of twen- 37 ty-five dollars. 38 § 12. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 1809-e of the vehicle 39 and traffic law, as amended by section 9 of part N of chapter 58 of the 40 laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 41 a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever proceedings in 42 a court or an administrative tribunal of this state result in a 43 conviction for an offense under this chapter, except a conviction pursu- 44 ant to section eleven hundred ninety-two of this chapter, or for a traf- 45 fic infraction under this chapter, or a local law, ordinance, rule or 46 regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, except: (i) a traffic 47 infraction involving standing, stopping, or parking or violations by 48 pedestrians or bicyclists; and (ii) an adjudication of liability of an 49 owner for a violation of subdivision (d) of section eleven hundred elev- 50 en of this chapter imposed pursuant to a local law or ordinance imposing 51 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 52 thereof to comply with traffic-control indications through the installa- 53 tion and operation of traffic-control signal photo violation-monitoring 54 systems, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; and 55 (iii) an adjudication of liability of an owner for a violation of subdi- 56 vision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of S. 1891--A 23 1 this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing mone- 2 tary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 3 thereof to comply with such posted maximum speed limits through the 4 installation and operation of photo speed violation monitoring systems, 5 in accordance with article thirty of this chapter; and (iv) an adjudi- 6 cation of liability of an owner for a violation of bus lane restrictions 7 as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter imposed pursuant to a 8 bus rapid transit program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 9 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such bus lane 10 restrictions through the installation and operation of bus lane photo 11 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; and (v) 12 an adjudication of liability of an owner for a violation of toll 13 collection regulations imposed by certain public authorities pursuant to 14 the law authorizing such public authorities to impose monetary liability 15 on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply 16 with toll collection regulations of such public authorities through the 17 installation and operation of photo-monitoring systems, in accordance 18 with section two thousand nine hundred eighty-five of the public author- 19 ities law or sections sixteen-a, sixteen-b and sixteen-c of chapter 20 seven hundred seventy-four of the laws of nineteen hundred fifty; and 21 (vi) an adjudication of liability of an owner for a violation of section 22 eleven hundred seventy-four of this chapter when meeting a school bus 23 marked and equipped as provided in subdivisions twenty and twenty-one-c 24 of section three hundred seventy-five of this chapter imposed pursuant 25 to a local law or ordinance imposing monetary liability on the owner of 26 a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with school bus 27 red visual signals through the installation and operation of school bus 28 photo violation monitoring systems, in accordance with article twenty- 29 nine of this chapter; and (vii) an adjudication of liability of an owner 30 for a violation of section three hundred eighty-five of this chapter and 31 the rules of the applicable covered agency or covered authority as such 32 terms are defined in article ten of this chapter in relation to gross 33 vehicle weight and/or axle weight violations imposed pursuant to a weigh 34 in motion demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner 35 of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such 36 gross vehicle weight and/or axle weight restrictions through the instal- 37 lation and operation of weigh in motion violation monitoring systems, in 38 accordance with article ten of this chapter; and (viii) an adjudication 39 of liability of an owner for a violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or 40 (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter imposed pursuant to 41 a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of a 42 vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such posted 43 maximum speed limits within a highway construction or maintenance work 44 area through the installation and operation of photo speed violation 45 monitoring systems, in accordance with article thirty of this chapter; 46 and (ix) an adjudication of liability of an owner for a violation of bus 47 operation-related traffic regulations as defined by article twenty-four 48 of this chapter imposed pursuant to a demonstration program imposing 49 monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator 50 thereof to comply with such bus operation-related traffic regulations 51 through the installation and operation of bus operation-related photo 52 devices, in accordance with article twenty-four of this chapter; and (x) 53 an adjudication of liability of an owner for a violation of street 54 cleaning parking rules as defined by article twenty-four of this chapter 55 imposed pursuant to a program imposing monetary liability on the owner 56 of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with such S. 1891--A 24 1 street cleaning parking rules through the installation and operation of 2 street cleaning vehicle photo devices, in accordance with article twen- 3 ty-four of this chapter, there shall be levied in addition to any 4 sentence, penalty or other surcharge required or permitted by law, an 5 additional surcharge of twenty-eight dollars. 6 § 13. Subdivision 2 of section 87 of the public officers law is 7 amended by adding a new paragraph (w) to read as follows: 8 (w) are photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 9 images prepared under authority of section eleven hundred eleven-j of 10 the vehicle and traffic law. 11 § 14. The purchase or lease of equipment for a demonstration program 12 established pursuant to section 1111-j of the vehicle and traffic law, 13 as added by section one of this act, shall be subject to the provisions 14 of section 103 of the general municipal law. 15 § 15. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day 16 after it shall have become a law; provided, however, that sections one, 17 thirteen and fourteen of this act shall expire July 1, 2032, when upon 18 such date the provisions of such sections shall be deemed repealed; 19 provided further, however, that: 20 (a) the amendments to subdivision 1 of section 1809-a of the vehicle 21 and traffic law made by section ten of this act shall not affect the 22 repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith; and 23 (b) effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 24 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of section one 25 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 26 completed on or before such effective date.